src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-OBL-CASES
+Car+So/PC:тӧгныс K ; !
+Car+So/PC:ныстӧг K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:тэгныс K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныстэг K ; !
+Cns:нысла K ;
+Com+So/CP:кӧдныс K ; !
+Com+So/PC:ныскӧд K ; !
+Com+So/CP+Err/Dial:кедныс K ; !
+Com+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныскед K ; !
+Dat:лыныс K ;
+Dat:лыныслы K ;
+Dat:ныслы K ;
+Ela:сьыныс K ;
+Ins:наныс K ;
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3


LEXICON PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES
+Ine+PxPl1:аным K ;
+Ine+PxPl1+Err/Dial:анум K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:аныд K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:аныс K ;
+Sg1+Ill:ӧ K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ill+PxSg1:ам K ; !Ӧнія коми кыв gives this for illative only
+Ill+PxSg2:ад K ; !
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1:аным K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1+Err/Dial:анум K ; !
+Ill+PxPl2:аныд K ; !
+Ill+PxPl3:аныс K ; !
+Apr+PxSg1:лань K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным K ;
+Apr+PxPl1+Err/Dial:ланьнум K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ланьныд K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ланьныс K ;
+Egr+PxSg1:сянь K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+Err/Dial:сяньнум K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:сяньныс K ;
+Tra+PxSg1:ті K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Tra+PxSg2:тіыд K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
! Pl1 and Pl2 are not attested in Ӧнія коми кыв
+Tra+PxPl3:тіныс K ;
+Ter+PxSg1:%>ӧдз K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ter+PxSg2:%>ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>ӧдзыс K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>эдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>эдзыс K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:нымӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумедз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:ныдӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:нысӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2+Err/Dial:ныдэдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3+Err/Dial:нысэдз K ;
!Extras 2011-10-07


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-NOM
 ACC-WORD-END ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ILL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INE/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON-POSS
+Sg: PRON-POSS_CASES ;
+Pl:%>ъяс PRON-POSS_CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-POSS_CASES
 ABL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ACC-WORD-END ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 EGR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 GEN/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ILL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INE/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 PRL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR ;
PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR ;
CNS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 DAT/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
+AprIll:%>ланьӧ IllCompar ; !
+AprIll+Err/Dial:%>лане IllCompar ; !

+Nom+PxSg2:%>ыд K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс K ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! This is bare
! COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
! EGR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-CAR/ELA/NOM
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ;
! EGR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-ACC
+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-NOM
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
! GEN/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
! ILL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-ACC
+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-NOM
+Acc:%>ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс WordEnd ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 TER/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ;  !! bare
! ABL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
!+Der+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-NOM
 ACC-PXSG2/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 CNS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
!+Der+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-ACC
 ACC-PXPL2/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-NOM
 CNS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-GEN
!+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
! GEN/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
! PRL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
!

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-ACC
ACC-PXPL3/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAG
+Dem: WordEnd ; ! sg/pl?

LEXICON ADNDEMTAG
+Det+Dem: K ;
+Det+Dem+Cop+Pl:%>ӧсь K ;
+Det+Dem: Noun1 ;
!+Adn+Dem: K ;
!+Adn+Dem+Cop+Pl:%>ӧсь K ;
!+Adn+Dem+Der/MWN: Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-ES
+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>ійӧ K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>ійӧс K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>ійӧн K ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+Err/Dial:%>іе K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc+Err/Dial:%>іес K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins+Err/Dial:%>іен K ;
+Dem+Sg:%>ы PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>іеяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійяс WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧян WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>іеян WordEnd ;
+Dem+Pl:%>ійян WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG-TA
+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>йӧ K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>йӧс K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>йӧн K ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+Err/Dial:%>е K ;
+Dem+Sg+Acc+Err/Dial:%>ес K ;
+Dem+Sg+Ins+Err/Dial:%>ен K ;
+Dem+Sg: PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йӧяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>еяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йӧян PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl+Err/Dial:%>еян PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Dem+Pl:%>йян PRONDEMTAGPL ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG 
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !distinct from Nom
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Com+Err/Dial:кед K ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тэг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !This is questioned in the 2000 Grammar
+Abl:лысь K ; !
 PRONDEMTAG-APR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-PRL ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TRA ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TER ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAGPL
!+Pron+Dem+Pl: WordEnd ;
 GEN/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;

+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс WordEnd ;
 ABL/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 APR/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 CNS/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 EGR/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 ILL/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 INE/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 INS/MORPH-THEN-K ;

 PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-INE ;
 PRL/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 TER/MORPH-THEN-K ;
 TRA/MORPH-THEN-K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-ELA
+Ela:ысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR
+Apr:лань K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR
+AprEgr:ланьсянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA
+AprEla:ланьысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL
+AprIll:ланьӧ K ;
+AprIll+Err/Dial:лане K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-INE
+AprIne:ланьын K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-EGR
+Egr:сянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-PRL
+Prl:ӧд K ;
+Prl+Err/Dial:%>эд K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-TRA
+Tra:ті K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-TER
+Ter:ӧдз K ;
+Ter+Err/Dial:%>эдз K ;

! Word forms that already have their morphology 
LEXICON PRON-DEM-IS_INE
+Dem+Ine: K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-IS_ILL
+Dem+Ill: K ;



!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON-INTER-NONHUM
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Nom: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Gen:лӧн K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Abl:лысь K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Dat:лы K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+ZeroAcc: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ins:ӧн K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Com:кӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Car:тӧг K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Cns:ла K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ine:ын K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ela:ысь K ; 
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ill:ӧ K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Apr:лань K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Egr:сянь K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Prl:ӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Tra:ті K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ter:ӧдз K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-HUM
+Neg+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Neg+Sg+Nom:і WordEnd ;
+Neg+Sg: PRON-NEG-OBL ;
+Neg+Pl+Nom:%>ъяс WordEnd ;
+Neg+Pl:%>ъяс PRON-NEG-OBL ;
