src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
мӧд+Pron:мӧд PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
некин+Pron:некин PRON-NEG-HUM  "" ;
некод+Pron:некод PRON-NEG-HUM  "ei kukaan" ;
сэтшӧм+Pron:сэтшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧм-татшӧм+Pron:сэтшӧм-татшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧма+Adv:сэтшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧмтӧ+Pron:сэтшӧмтӧ PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтысь+Adv:сэтысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
сэтысянь+Adv:сэтысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
сэтӧні+Adv:сэтӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сійӧ+Pron:сы PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
тайӧ+Pron:та PRONDEMTAGSG-TA  "tuo" ;
татшӧм+Pron:татшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
татӧні+Adv:татӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
таян+Pron:таян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
эстшӧм+Pron:эстшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстшӧма+Pron:эстшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстысь+Adv:эстысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
эстысянь+Adv:эстысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
эсы+Adv:эсы PRONDEMTAG  "tuo" ;
эсыладор+Adv:эсыладор PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсылань+Adv:эсылань PRONDEMTAG-APR  "" ;
эсыметь+Pron:эсыметь PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсымында+Adv:эсымында PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсійӧ+Pron:эс PRONDEMTAG-ES  "tuo" ;
эсіян+Pron:эсіян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
этайӧ+Pron:эта PRONDEMTAGSG-TA  "juuri tämä" ;
эталань+Pron:эталань PRONDEMTAG-APR  "" ;
эталаньсянь+Pron:эталаньсянь PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR  "" ;
эталаньысь+Pron:эталаньысь PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA  "" ;
эталаньӧ+Pron:эталаньӧ PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL  "" ;
этан+Adv:этан PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этані+Adv:этані PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧм+Pron:этатшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧма+Pron:этатшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатысь+Adv:этатысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
этатысянь+Adv:этатысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
этійӧ+Pron:этійӧ PRONDEMTAG  "juuri tämä" ;
этійӧ+Pron:этійӧ PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
